Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-804
Institute; purpose; function; grants; gifts.

It shall be the purpose and function of the institute to carry on research into the causes, control and cure for cancer and similar disorders and to conduct symposia and lectures and to issue monographs, treatises and reports so that the findings, techniques and discoveries developed or confirmed by the institute may be disseminated to the medical profession, medical schools and research centers to accelerate the conquest of cancer and to relieve those suffering therefrom. To carry out such purpose and function, the institute may receive and accept, through the University of Nebraska, any grants, gifts or other contributions from any governmental or public agency or from any other person, firm or corporation.

Laws 1972, LB 1374, § 4.